Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6396.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 281. (1) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2027, a qualified taxpayer may claim a credit against the tax imposed under this part in an amount equal to the difference between the amount of the fee that the taxpayer would have paid in the tax year under section 11109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11109, as it existed before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and the sum of the following: (a) The amount the taxpayer actually paid in the tax year under section 11109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11109. (b) Any similar fees or surcharges implemented on TENORM disposed of in a landfill after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and paid by the taxpayer in the tax year. (2) For a qualified taxpayer who is a member of a flow-through entity that qualifies for the credit under this section, that taxpayer may claim a credit against the member's tax liability under this part based on the member's distributive share of business income reported from that flow-through entity or an alternative method approved by the department. (3) If the credit allowed under this section for the tax year exceeds the qualified taxpayer's tax liability for the tax year, that portion that exceeds the tax liability for the tax year must be refunded. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Michigan-based business" means a business that would qualify for a preference in a procurement contract with this state as determined under section 268 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1268. (b) "Qualified taxpayer" means a taxpayer that is a Michigan-based business subject to the fees assessed under section 11109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11109. (c) "TENORM" means that term as defined under section 11104 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11104. Sec. 678. (1) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2027, a qualified taxpayer may claim a credit against the tax imposed under this part in an amount equal to the difference between the amount of the fee that the taxpayer would have paid in the tax year under section 11109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11109, as it existed before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and the sum of the following: (a) The amount the taxpayer actually paid in the tax year under section 11109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11109. (b) Any similar fees or surcharges implemented on TENORM disposed of in a landfill after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and paid by the taxpayer in the tax year. (2) If the credit allowed under this section for the tax year exceeds the qualified taxpayer's tax liability for the tax year, that portion that exceeds the tax liability for the tax year must be refunded. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Michigan-based business" means a business that would qualify for a preference in a procurement contract with this state as determined under section 268 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1268. (b) "Qualified taxpayer" means a taxpayer that is a Michigan-based business subject to the fees assessed under section 11109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11109. (c) "TENORM" means that term as defined under section 11104 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11104. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6395 (request no. H03901'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.